District of Columbia statutes.
1-624.09

Severance pay.

(a)

An employee separated pursuant to this subchapter shall be entitled to severance pay in accordance with subchapter XI of this chapter, except as provided in this section.

(b)

Additional service credit shall be applied as follows:

(1)

Four years for an employee who qualifies for veterans preference; and

(2)

Three years for an employee who qualifies for District residency preference.

(c)

The total severance pay received over an employee’s career in the District government shall not exceed 26 weeks of pay at the rate received immediately before separation.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2409
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(x)(3), 45 DCR 2464
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, §§ 108(c), 109(e), 47 DCR 520

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-608.01a and § 1-609.58.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-625.8.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-91 designated the former introductory paragraph as subsec. (a), and redesignated former par. (1) as subsec. (b), former subpar. (1)(A) as par. (b)(1), former subpar. (1)(B) as par. (b)(2), and former par. (2) as subsec. (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Mental Retardation and Developmental Disabilities Administration Voluntary Severance Incentive Plan Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-548, January 11, 2001, 48 DCR 774).

Construction of Law

Construction of Law 12-124

Section 301 of D.C. Law 12-124 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, approved August 5, 1997 (Public Law 105-33; 111 Stat. 712), except that § 47-395.04(b)(3) is expressly superseded. Further, nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of § 47-391.01 et seq. or of § 164 of the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1998, approved November 19, 1997 (Public Law 105-100; 111 Stat. 2160).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of § 101(x) of D.C. Law 12-124: Section 401(a) of D.C. Law 12-124, as amended by § 60 of D.C. Law 12-264, provided that § 101(d), (k), (p), (s), and (x) of this act shall apply upon the enactment of legislation by the United States Congress that states the following: “Notwithstanding any other law, section 101(d), (k), (p), (s), and (x) of the Omnibus Personnel Reform Act of 1998, adopted by the Council of the District of Columbia is enacted into law.” Section 134 of Title I of Division C of Pub. L. 105-277, 112 Stat. 2681-596, provided that “Notwithstanding any other law, sections 101(d), (k), (p), (s), and (x) of the Omnibus Personnel Reform Amendment Act of 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, effective June 11, 1998, are enacted into law.”